Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-631
Prospective application.

The Uniform Electronic Transactions Act applies to any electronic record or electronic signature created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored on or after July 13, 2000.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-2104;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 393.